Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-1505.03
Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel; created; members; duties; expenses.

(1) There is hereby created the Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel. The panel shall consist of the following:

(a) Two members who are not owners or representatives of owners of small business stationary sources of air emissions selected by the Governor to represent the general public;

(b) Four members selected by the Legislature who are owners or who represent owners of small business stationary sources of air emissions; and

(c) One member selected by the director.

(2) The panel shall be responsible for all requirements of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2004. Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The panel shall conduct its meetings in accordance with the Open Meetings Act and shall submit an annual report to the Governor no later than January 1 of each year. The panel shall receive necessary staff support from the department.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 81;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 31;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 121.
January 1, 2021
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.